Minnesota, session 2025-2026, SF3889.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF MINNESOTA: Section 1. new text begin REQUIRED RULEMAKING; YOUTH HUNTING DAYS.new text end new text begin The commissioner of natural resources must amend Minnesota Rules, part 6240.0610, subpart 1, to provide that Youth Waterfowl Hunting Days take place on two days each weekend for two consecutive weekends per year. The commissioner may use the good cause exempt rulemaking procedure under Minnesota Statutes, section 14.388, subdivision 1, clause (3), and Minnesota Statutes, section 14.386, does not apply. new text end